District of Columbia statutes.
22-3301

Forcible entry and detainer.

Whoever shall forcibly enter upon any premises, or, having entered without force, shall unlawfully detain the same by force against any person previously in the peaceable possession of the same and claiming right thereto, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1327, ch. 854, § 851
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(m), 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3101.
1973 Ed., § 22-3101.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $100”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(m) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.